Utah statutes.
62A-4a-102.   Policy responsibilities of division.
(1)  The Division of Child and Family Services, created in Section 62A-4a-103,
is responsible for establishing policies for the division, by rule, under
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter and Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act
of 1996, regarding abuse, neglect, and dependency proceedings, and domestic
violence services.  The division is responsible to see that the legislative
purposes for the division are carried out.
(2)  The division shall:
(a)  approve fee schedules for programs within the division;
(b)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, establish, by rule, policies to ensure that private citizens, consumers,
foster parents, private contract providers, allied state and local agencies,
and others are provided with an opportunity to comment and provide input
regarding any new policy or proposed revision of an existing policy; and
(c)  provide a mechanism for:
(i)  systematic and regular review of existing policy; and
(ii)  consideration of policy changes proposed by the persons and agencies
described in Subsection (2)(b).
(3) (a)  The division shall establish rules for the determination of
eligibility for services offered by the division in accordance with this
chapter.
(b)  The division may, by rule, establish eligibility standards for consumers.
(4)  The division shall adopt and maintain rules regarding placement for
adoption or foster care that are consistent with, and no more restrictive
than, applicable statutory provisions.
